Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 5 Electronic Recording Voting Systems

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 14, effective April 20, 1998, enacted this part. This part was then reenacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37, effective January 1, 1999.

21-2-379.1.
Requirements for use of direct recording electronic voting systems.

No direct recording electronic voting system shall be adopted or used unless it shall, at the time, satisfy the following requirements:

It shall provide facilities for voting for such candidates as may be nominated and upon such questions as may be submitted;

It shall permit each elector, in one operation, to vote for all the candidates of one party or body for presidential electors;

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this Code section for presidential electors, it shall permit each elector, at other than primaries, to vote a ticket selected from the nominees of any and all parties or bodies, from independent nominations, and from persons not in nomination;

It shall permit each elector to vote, at any election, for any person and for any office for whom and for which he or she is lawfully entitled to vote, whether or not the name of such person or persons appears as a candidate for election; to vote for as many persons for an office as he or she is entitled to vote for; and to vote for or against any question upon which he or she is entitled to vote;

It shall preclude the counting of votes for any candidate or upon any question for whom or upon which an elector is not entitled to vote; shall preclude the counting of votes for more persons for any office than he or she is entitled to vote for; and shall preclude the counting of votes for any candidate for the same office or upon any question more than once;

It shall permit voting in absolute secrecy so that no person can see or know for whom any other elector has voted or is voting, save an elector whom he or she has assisted or is assisting in voting, as prescribed by law;

It shall be constructed of material of good quality in a neat and workmanlike manner;

It shall, when properly operated, record correctly and accurately every vote cast;

It shall be so constructed that an elector may readily learn the method of operating it; and

It shall be safely transportable.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 2008, p. 261, § 1/SB 456.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Ballot secrecy, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.01.

21-2-379.2.
Review of manufacturer’s recording electronic voting system by Secretary of State; appointment and compensation of examiners; revocation of approval; penalties; conflicts of interest.

Any person or organization owning, manufacturing, or selling, or being interested in the manufacture or sale of, any direct recording electronic voting system may request the Secretary of State to examine the system. Any ten or more electors of this state may, at any time, request the Secretary of State to reexamine any such system previously examined and approved by him or her. Before any such examination or reexamination, the person, persons, or organization requesting such examination or reexamination shall pay to the Secretary of State the reasonable expenses of such examination. The Secretary of State may, at any time, in his or her discretion, reexamine any such system.

The Secretary of State shall thereupon examine or reexamine such direct recording electronic voting system and shall make and file in his or her office a report, attested by his or her signature and the seal of his or her office, stating whether, in his or her opinion, the kind of system so examined can be safely and accurately used by electors at primaries and elections as provided in this chapter. If this report states that the system can be so used, the system shall be deemed approved; and systems of its kind may be adopted for use at primaries and elections as provided in this chapter.

No kind of direct recording electronic voting system not so approved shall be used at any primary or election and if, upon the reexamination of any such system previously approved, it shall appear that the system so reexamined can no longer be safely or accurately used by electors at primaries or elections as provided in this chapter because of any problem concerning its ability to accurately record or tabulate votes, the approval of the same shall immediately be revoked by the Secretary of State; and no such system shall thereafter be purchased for use or be used in this state.

Reserved.

Any vendor who completes a sale of a direct recording electronic voting system that has not been certified by the Secretary of State to a governmental body in this state shall be subject to a penalty of $100,000.00, payable to the State of Georgia, plus reimbursement of all costs and expenses incurred by the governmental body in connection with the sale. The State Election Board shall have authority to impose such penalty upon a finding that such a sale has occurred.

When a direct recording electronic voting system has been so approved, no improvement or change that does not impair its accuracy, efficiency, or capacity shall render necessary a reexamination or reapproval of such system, or of its kind.

Neither the Secretary of State, nor any custodian, nor the governing authority of any county or municipality or a member of such authority nor any other person involved in the examination process shall have any pecuniary interest in any direct recording electronic voting system or in the manufacture or sale thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 31; Ga. L. 2008, p. 261, § 1/SB 456; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 9/SB 82.

21-2-379.3.
State furnishing direct recording voting systems; purchase by municipalities or counties.

The state shall furnish a uniform system of direct recording electronic (DRE) equipment for use in each county by 2004. The governing authority of a municipality may elect to acquire its own DRE equipment by purchase, lease, rental, or other procurement process at its own expense. The governing authority of a county may purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire more of the type of DRE equipment furnished by the state, if the governing authority so desires, at its own expense.

The governing authority of a municipality or a county desiring to acquire such equipment may at any regular meeting or at a special meeting called for the purpose, by a majority vote, authorize and direct the acquisition of such equipment. Bonds or other evidence of indebtedness may be issued in accordance with the provisions of law relating to the increase of indebtedness of counties and municipalities to meet all or any part of the cost of such DRE voting systems.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 1-2.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Conduct of elections, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.01.

21-2-379.4.
Ballot appearance; write in votes on DRE systems.

The ballots for direct recording electronic (DRE) voting systems shall be of such size and arrangement as will suit the construction of the DRE screen and shall be in plain, clear type that is easily readable by persons with normal vision. If the equipment has the capacity for color display, the names of all candidates in a particular race shall be displayed in the same color, font, and size and the political party or body affiliation of candidates may be displayed in a color different from that used to display the names of the candidates, but all political party or body affiliations shall be displayed in the same color. All candidates’ names and political parties shall be printed in the same size and font. All ballot questions and constitutional amendments shall be displayed in the same color.

The arrangement of offices, names of candidates, and questions upon the ballots shall conform as nearly as practicable to this chapter for the arrangement of such offices, names of candidates, and questions on paper ballots.

Electors shall be permitted to cast write-in votes on DRE voting systems as provided in Code Section 21-2-133. The design of the ballot shall permit the election superintendent and poll workers when obtaining the vote count from such systems to determine readily whether an elector has cast any write-in vote not authorized by law.

The form and arrangement of ballots shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State and prepared by the election superintendent.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 1-3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 151, § 1.

21-2-379.5.
Ballot information.

If two or more candidates for the same nomination or office shall have the same or similar names, the Secretary of State, in the case of federal or state offices, the superintendent of elections, in the case of county offices, or the official with whom such candidates qualify, in the case of municipal elections, shall print or cause to be printed the residence of all candidates for such nomination or office on the ballot under their names. The designated official shall determine whether the names of the candidates are of such a similar nature as to warrant printing the residence of all candidates for that office on the ballot; and the decision of the designated official shall be conclusive.

The ballot for each candidate or group of candidates nominated by a political party or body shall display the name or designation of the political party or body.

The incumbency of a candidate seeking election for the public office he or she then holds shall be indicated on the ballot.

Unless a candidate has filed with his or her nominating petition a certificate from a political party or body attesting that such candidate is the nominee of such party or body by virtue of having been nominated in a duly constituted party or body convention, the candidate’s name shall appear on the ballot as an independent.

When presidential electors are to be elected, the ballot shall not list the individual names of the candidates for presidential electors but shall list the names of each political party and body and the names of the political party or body candidates for the office of President and Vice President. The individual names or the nominees of each political party or body for such offices shall be posted at each polling place with the sample ballots required by subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-379.7 arranged alphabetically under the names of the candidates of the party or body for President and Vice President of the United States. A vote for the candidates for President and Vice President of a political party or body shall be deemed to be a vote for each of the candidates for presidential electors of such political party or body.

When proposed constitutional amendments or other questions are submitted to a vote of the electors, each amendment or other question so submitted may be printed upon the ballot below the groups of candidates for the various offices. Proposed constitutional amendments so submitted shall be printed in the order determined by the Constitutional Amendments Publication Board and in brief form as directed by the General Assembly or, in the event of a failure to so direct, the form shall be determined by the Secretary of State and shall include the short title or heading provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 50-12-101. Unless otherwise provided by law, any other state-wide questions or questions to be presented to the electors of more than one county so submitted shall be printed in brief form as directed by the General Assembly or, in the event of a failure to so direct, the form shall be determined by the Secretary of State and shall include a short title or heading in bold face at the beginning of each such question on the ballot; and any local questions so submitted shall be printed in brief form as directed by the General Assembly or, in the event of a failure to so direct, the form shall be determined by the superintendent. Next to or below the question there shall be placed the words “YES” and “NO” between which the elector may choose in casting his or her vote.

The ballots shall vary in form only as the names of precincts, offices, candidates, or this chapter may require.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 1-4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 31; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 24/SB 92.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Appearance of candidate’s name on ballot, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.02.

Direct recording electronic voting equipment, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.02.

21-2-379.6.
Maintenance of voting systems and supplies.

The superintendent of each county or municipality shall cause the proper ballot design and style to be programmed for each direct recording electronic (DRE) unit which is to be used in any precinct within such county or municipality, cause each such unit to be placed in proper order for voting, examine each unit before it is sent to a polling place, verify that each registering mechanism is set at zero, and properly secure each unit so that the counting machinery cannot be operated until later authorized.

The superintendent may appoint, with the approval of the county or municipal governing authority, as appropriate, a custodian of the DRE units, and deputy custodians as may be necessary, whose duty shall be to prepare the units to be used in the county or municipality at the primaries and elections to be held therein. Each custodian and deputy custodian shall receive from the county or municipality such compensation as shall be fixed by the governing authority of the county or municipality. Such custodian shall, under the direction of the superintendent, have charge of and represent the superintendent during the preparation of the units as required by this chapter. The custodian and deputy custodians shall serve at the pleasure of the superintendent. Each custodian shall take an oath of office prepared by the Secretary of State before each primary or election which shall be filed with the superintendent.

On or before the third day preceding a primary or election, including special primaries, special elections, and referendum elections, the superintendent shall have each DRE unit tested to ascertain that it will correctly count the votes cast for all offices and on all questions in a manner that the State Election Board shall prescribe by rule or regulation. On or before the third day preceding a primary runoff or election runoff, including special primary runoffs and special election runoffs, the superintendent shall test a number of DRE units at random to ascertain that the units will correctly count the votes cast for all offices. If the total number of DRE units in the county or municipality is 30 units or less, all of the units shall be tested. If the total number of DRE units in the county or municipality is more than 30 but not more than 100, then at least one-half of the units shall be tested at random. If there are more than 100 DRE units in the county or municipality, the superintendent shall test at least 15 percent of the units at random. In no event shall the superintendent test less than one DRE unit per precinct. All memory cards to be used in the runoff shall be tested. Public notice of the time and place of the test shall be made at least five days prior thereto; provided, however, that, in the case of a runoff, the public notice shall be made at least three days prior thereto. Representatives of political parties and bodies, news media, and the public shall be permitted to observe such tests.

In every primary or election, the superintendent shall furnish, at the expense of the county or municipality, all ballots, forms of certificates, and other papers and supplies required under this chapter which are not furnished by the Secretary of State, all of which shall be in the form and according to any specifications prescribed, from time to time, by the Secretary of State.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 1-4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 32; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 49/HB 244.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Direct recording electronic voting equipment, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.02.

21-2-379.7.
Preparation of polling places.

The superintendent or the custodians shall deliver the proper direct recording electronic (DRE) units to the polling places of the respective precincts at least one hour before the time for opening the polls at each primary or election and shall cause each unit to be set up in the proper manner for use in voting.

The superintendent shall require that each DRE unit be thoroughly tested, inspected, and sealed prior to the delivery of each DRE unit to the polling place. Prior to opening the polls each day on which the units will be used in a primary or election, the manager shall break the seal on each unit, turn on each unit, certify that each unit is operating properly and is set to zero, and print a zero tape certifying that each unit is set to zero and shall keep or record such certification on each unit.

The superintendent and poll managers shall provide ample protection against molestation of and injury to the DRE units, and, for that purpose, the superintendent and poll manager may call upon any law enforcement officer to furnish such assistance as may be necessary. It shall be the duty of any such law enforcement officer to furnish such assistance when so requested by the superintendent or poll manager.

The superintendent shall, at least one hour prior to the opening of the polls:

Provide sufficient lighting to enable electors, if needed in the voting booth, to read the ballot and which shall be suitable for the use of the poll officers in examining the booth and conducting their responsibilities;

Provide directions for voting on the DRE units which shall be prominently posted within each voting booth and at least two sample ballots for the primary or election which shall be prominently posted outside the enclosed space within the polling place;

Ensure that each DRE unit’s tabulating mechanism is secure throughout the day during the primary or election;

Provide at least one DRE unit accessible to disabled electors at each precinct; and

Provide such other materials and supplies as may be necessary or required by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 1-4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 151, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 33.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Direct recording electronic voting equipment, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.02.

Use of absentee ballots when voting machines are inaccessible, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.10.

21-2-379.8.
Public exhibition of voting system and sample ballot.

The superintendent or his or her designee shall, upon request, make available for demonstration direct recording electronic (DRE) units. The Secretary of State shall advise the superintendents on recommended methods of demonstrating such units so as to properly educate electors in the use thereof, and, at least during the initial year in which DRE equipment is used in a county or municipality, all superintendents shall offer a series of demonstrations and organized voter education initiatives to equip electors for using such equipment in voting.

At least 45 days before a general primary or election or during the ten days before a special primary or election and at least 21 days before a municipal general primary or election or during the ten days before a municipal special primary or election, the superintendent shall place on public exhibition, in such public places and at such times as the superintendent shall deem most suitable for the information and instruction of the electors, a sample ballot to be used in such election. The sample ballot shall show the offices and questions to be voted upon, the names and arrangements of the political parties and bodies, and the names and arrangements of the candidates to be voted for. Such sample ballots shall be under the charge and care of a person who is, in the opinion of the superintendent, competent and qualified as an instructor concerning such ballots and voting procedures.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 1-4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 16/HB 540.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Direct recording electronic voting equipment, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.02.

21-2-379.9.
Storage of voting equipment.

All direct recording electronic (DRE) units and related equipment, when not in use, shall be properly stored and secured under conditions as shall be specified by the Secretary of State.

The superintendent shall store the units and related equipment under his or her supervision or shall designate a person or entity who shall provide secure storage of such units and related equipment when it is not in use at a primary or election. The superintendent shall provide compensation for the safe storage and care of such units and related equipment if the units and related equipment are stored by a person or entity other than the superintendent.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 1-4.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Direct recording electronic voting equipment, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.02.

21-2-379.10.
Procedure for electors.

A duly qualified elector shall cast his or her vote on a direct recording electronic (DRE) unit by touching the screen or pressing the appropriate button on the unit for the candidate or issue of such elector’s choice. After having the opportunity to vote in all races and upon all questions in which the elector is eligible to vote, the unit shall display a summary of the choices which the elector has made. At that time, the elector shall also be notified of any races or questions in which the elector did not make a selection and all other choices of the elector shall be displayed for the elector’s review. The elector shall have the opportunity to change any choices which the elector made in voting the ballot and be allowed to vote in those races and on those questions which the elector did not previously make a selection or cast a vote, and the elector will again be presented with a summary display of his or her choices.

After the summary screen is displayed and the elector desires to make no further changes to his or her votes, the elector shall be notified that he or she is about to cast the ballot. The elector shall then press the appropriate button on the unit or location on the screen to actually cast his or her ballot. After pressing the appropriate button on the unit or location on the screen to cast the ballot, the elector’s vote shall be final and shall not be subsequently altered.

If an elector leaves the voting booth without having pressed the appropriate button on the unit or location on the screen to finally cast his or her ballot and cannot be located to return to the booth to complete the voting process, then a poll worker shall take the steps necessary to void the ballot that was not completed by the elector and an appropriate record shall be made of such event.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 1-4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 151, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Direct recording electronic voting equipment, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.02.

21-2-379.11.
Procedure for tabulation of votes.

In primaries and elections in which direct recording electronic (DRE) voting equipment is used, the ballots shall be counted at the precinct or tabulating center under the direction of the superintendent. All persons who perform any duties at the tabulating center shall be deputized by the superintendent and only persons so deputized shall touch any ballot, container, paper, or machine utilized in the conduct of the count or be permitted to be in the immediate area designated for officers deputized to conduct the count.

All proceedings at the tabulating center and precincts shall be open to the view of the public, but no person except one employed and designated for the purpose by the superintendent or the superintendent’s authorized deputy shall touch any ballot, any DRE unit, or the tabulating equipment.

After the polls have closed and all voting in the precinct has ceased, the poll manager shall shut down the DRE units and extract the election results from each unit as follows:

The manager shall obtain the results tape from each DRE unit and verify that the number of ballots cast as recorded on the tape matches the public count number as displayed on the DRE unit;

If a system is established by the Secretary of State, the poll manager shall first transmit the election results extracted from each DRE unit in each precinct via modem to the central tabulating center of the county; and

The manager shall then extract the memory card from each DRE unit.

Upon completion of shutting down each DRE unit and extracting the election results, the manager shall cause to be completed and signed a ballot recap form, in sufficient counterparts, showing:

The number of valid ballots;

The number of spoiled and invalid ballots;

The number of provisional ballots; and

The number of unused provisional ballots and any other unused ballots.

The manager shall cause to be placed in the ballot supply container one copy of the recap form and any unused, defective, spoiled, and invalid ballots, each enclosed in an envelope.

The manager shall collect and retain the zero tape and the results tape for each DRE unit and place such tapes with the memory card for each unit, and all such items for all of the DRE units used in the precinct shall be sealed in an envelope or container and initialed or signed by the manager so that it cannot be opened without breaking the seal.

The manager and one poll worker shall then deliver the envelope or container to the tabulating center for the county or municipality or to such other place designated by the superintendent and shall receive a receipt therefor. The copies of the recap forms, unused ballots, records, and other materials shall be returned to the designated location and retained as provided by law.

Upon receipt of the sealed envelope or container containing the zero tapes, results tapes, and memory cards, the election superintendent shall verify the initials or signatures on the envelope. Once verified, the superintendent shall break the seal of the envelope or container and remove its contents. The superintendent shall then download the results stored on the memory card from each DRE unit into the election management system located at the central tabulation point of the county in order to obtain election results for certification.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 598, § 1-4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 34; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 25/SB 92.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Direct recording electronic voting equipment, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.02.

Spoiled ballot definition, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.07.

21-2-379.12.
[Repealed] Direct recording electronic (DRE) voting equipment pilot program.

History.

Code 1981, § 21-3-379.12, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 557, § 2/SB 500; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 557, § 2/SB 500, effective February 1, 2007.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 557, § 1/SB 500, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘2006 Georgia Accuracy in Elections Act.’ ”